Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-111
Annual report.

The Nebraska State Fair Board shall, no later than November 1 of each
year, provide an annual report to the Governor and the Legislature regarding
the use of the Nebraska State Fair Support and Improvement Cash Fund. The
report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically. The report shall include (1)
a detailed listing of how the proceeds of the fund were expended in the prior
fiscal year and (2) any distributions from the fund that remain unexpended
and on deposit in Nebraska State Fair accounts.

Laws 2005, LB 426, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB435, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB224, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 1.